Hawaii, session 2025, SB669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§196-    Rooftop photovoltaic energy generating system installation required for new single-family residential construction.  (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, no building permit shall be issued for a new single-family dwelling that is part of a development of twenty or more dwellings and does not include a rooftop photovoltaic energy generating system, unless the chief energy officer of the Hawaii state energy office approves a variance.  A variance application shall only be accepted if submitted by an architect or electrical engineer licensed under chapter 464, who attests that: (1)  Installation is impracticable due to poor solar resource; or (2)  Installation is cost-prohibitive based upon a life cycle cost-benefit analysis that incorporates the average residential utility bill and the cost of the new rooftop photovoltaic energy generating system, including any specific interconnection costs, with a life cycle of twenty-five years. (b)  A request for a variance shall be submitted to the Hawaii state energy office on an application prescribed by the chief energy officer and shall include a description of the location of the property and justification for the approval of a variance using the criteria established in subsection (a).  A variance shall be deemed approved if not denied within sixty working days after receipt of the variance application.  The chief energy officer shall publicize: (1)  All applications for a variance, including cost estimates, within seven calendar days after receipt of the variance application; and (2)  The disposition of all applications for a variance within seven calendar days of the determination of the variance application. (c)  The chief energy officer of the Hawaii state energy office may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to impose and collect fees to cover the costs of administering variances under this section.  The fees, if any, shall be deposited into the energy security special fund established under section 201-12.8. (d)  Nothing in this section shall preclude any county from establishing procedures and standards required to implement this section. (e)  Nothing in this section shall preclude participation in any utility demand-side management program or public benefits fee program under part VII of chapter 269. (f) For the purposes of this section, "rooftop photovoltaic energy generating system" means any identifiable facility, equipment, apparatus, or the like, that utilizes electricity-generating modules mounted on a rooftop, or near the subject property, that converts solar energy to useful electrical energy for heating, cooling, or reducing the use of other types of energy that are dependent upon fossil fuel for the generation of electricity; provided that the system shall have not less than five kilowatts of generating capacity and shall include an energy storage device, such as a battery." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________